Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 6. Payment of Claims.

§ 22.1-122.
Approval and payment of claims; warrants; prohibited acts.

Except as provided in § 22.1-122.1, a school board shall examine all claims against it and, when approved, shall order or authorize the payment thereof. A record of such approval and order or authorization shall be made in the minutes of the school board. Payment of each claim shall be ordered or authorized by a warrant drawn on the treasurer or other officer charged by law with the responsibility for the receipt, custody and disbursement of the funds of the school board. The warrant shall be signed by the chairman or vice-chairman of the school board, countersigned by the clerk or deputy clerk thereof, made payable to the person or persons, firm or corporation entitled to receive such payment and recorded in the form and manner prescribed by the Board of Education. There shall be stated on the face of the warrant the purpose or service for which such payment is drawn and the date of the order entered or authority granted by the school board.

A school board may, in its discretion by resolution, appoint an agent, and a deputy agent to act for the agent in his absence or inability to perform this duty, to examine and approve such claims and, when approved by him or his deputy, to order or authorize the payment thereof. A record of such approval and order or authorization shall be made and kept with the records of the school board. Payment of each such claim so examined and approved by such agent or his deputy shall be ordered or authorized by a warrant drawn on the treasurer or other officer charged by law with the responsibility for the receipt, custody, and disbursement of the funds made available to the school board. The warrant shall be signed by such agent or his deputy and countersigned by the clerk or deputy clerk of the school board, payable to the person or persons, firm or corporation entitled to receive such payments; provided, however, that when the agent appointed by the school board is the division superintendent and the division superintendent and clerk is one and the same person, all such warrants shall be countersigned by the chairman or vice-chairman of the school board and when the deputy agent and deputy clerk is one and the same person, the warrant shall be countersigned by either the clerk or the agent of the school board. There shall be stated on the face of the warrant the purpose or service for which such payment is made and also that such warrant is drawn pursuant to authority delegated to such agent or his deputy by the school board on the . . . . . day of . . . . . . .. The school board shall require such agent and his deputy to furnish a corporate surety bond conditioned upon the faithful performance and discharge of the duties herein assigned to each such official. The school board shall fix the amount of such bond or bonds and the premium therefor shall be paid out of the funds made available to the school board.

The school board of any school division composed of a county may provide, by resolution, for the drawing of special warrants in payment of compensation, when such compensation has been earned and is due, for (i) all employees and school bus operators under written contract, (ii) upon receipt of certified time sheets or other evidence of service performed, the payment of all other employees whose rates of pay have been established by the school board or its properly delegated agent, and (iii) for payment on contracts for school construction projects according to the terms of such contracts. All such special warrants so authorized shall be signed by the clerk or deputy clerk of the school board and countersigned by the division superintendent or the chairman or vice-chairman of the school board. When the division superintendent and clerk is one and the same person, such special warrants shall be countersigned by such chairman or vice-chairman. Such payrolls and contracts so paid shall be reviewed and approved by the school board at its next regular meeting.

Any warrant provided for in this section may be converted into a negotiable check when the name of the bank upon which the funds stated in the warrant are drawn or by which the check is to be paid is designated upon its face and is signed by the treasurer or other officer charged by law with the responsibility for the receipt, custody and disbursement of the funds of the school board.

The acts prohibited by §

15.2-1244

with respect to the ordering of the issuance of warrants by a board of supervisors and the signing and countersigning of such warrants by the clerk, deputy clerk, chairman, and vice-chairman of such board shall apply to the ordering of the issuance of warrants by a school board and to the signing and countersigning thereof by the chairman, vice-chairman, clerk, deputy clerk, agent and deputy agent of the school board. Any clerk, deputy clerk, agent, deputy agent or member of any school board who violates any provision of this section shall be guilty of both a Class 3 misdemeanor and malfeasance in office.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-73, 22-75, 22-76, 22-77, 22-78, 22-97; 1954, c. 291; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1968, c. 501; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 161; 1972, c. 426; 1975, cc. 308, 328; 1978, c. 430; 1980, c. 559; 1989, c. 179.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Malfeasance in office. —

Violations of the statute constitute malfeasance in office; the violation of the statute does not give rise, however, to a civil right of action on behalf of the county. Cty. of Lancaster v. Latimore, 97 Va. Cir. 401, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 228 (Lancaster County May 31, 2013).

School board has right to bring legal proceedings. —

County did not have a cause of action against school officials and a school board based on any alleged action under the statutory scheme being malfeasance in office because the statutory scheme gave the school board the right to bring legal proceedings to challenge any irregularity in the acts of an officer or employee but gave no such right to the county. Cty. of Lancaster v. Latimore, 97 Va. Cir. 401, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 228 (Lancaster County May 31, 2013).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Control over payroll. —

The authority to establish payroll dates for school division employees rests with the school board, including the establishment of regular payroll periods, but the mechanics of making the payments to schools rest with the treasurer of the locality. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable G. Glenn Oder and The Honorable Marty G. Eubank, Treasurer, City of Newport News, 11-003, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 14 (2/25/11).

§ 22.1-122.1.
Accounts to purchase certain materials and supplies.

A school board, by resolution and subject to the approval of the governing body, may establish accounts in each of its departments and schools committed solely for the purchase of instructional materials and office supplies. The school board may authorize the transfer of a percentage of the funds budgeted for a school or division department, not to exceed thirty-five percent of the allocation, into such account.

Such account shall be managed by the principal of the school or head of the division department who shall file a monthly accounting of the funds with the division superintendent. No additional funds shall be transferred into any such account unless the monthly accounting has been filed. The funds in the account may be disbursed for payment of obligations by issuing a negotiable check signed by the principal or head of the division department, and a second person to be designated by the school board. At the close of the fiscal year, all funds remaining in the accounts shall be returned to the school board simultaneously with a full accounting of the disbursements. All such accounts shall be subject to the requirements of §

15.2-2511

and relevant provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.).

History.

1989, c. 179; 1992, c. 175; 1999, c. 388.

The 1999 amendment,

in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, inserted “departments and,” deleted “which are not stocked or purchased directly by the school division, items costing no more than $500 per order and essential to meet immediate health, safety, or security needs,” and inserted “or division department” in the second sentence, in the second paragraph, and inserted “or head of the division department” in the first and third sentences.

§ 22.1-123.
Petty cash funds; payment of claims from petty cash.

Any school board may by resolution establish one or more petty cash funds, not exceeding $2,000 each, for the payment of claims arising from commitments made pursuant to provisions of law.

A school board may appoint an agent or other person who shall be authorized only to approve payment of claims arising from commitments made pursuant to provisions of law from such petty cash funds as may be established by the school board. Any agent or person into whose hands any such fund is placed may pay such claims therefrom without necessity of prior receipt and audit of the claims by the school board and without approval and issuance of the warrant of the school board.

The clerk of the school board shall report this action to the school board or to any appointed agent of the school board for approval and reimbursement at least within thirty days of the month following the month in which any claim has been paid.

Any agent or person into whose hands such fund is placed shall give bond with surety in the amount of $4,000, provided that additional bond shall not be required of any agent or person already bonded in the required amount.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-74; 1972, c. 462; 1976, c. 18; 1980, c. 559; 1985, c. 194; 1991, c. 386; 1994, c. 55.

§ 22.1-124.
Officers may not purchase warrants for less than face value.

It shall be unlawful for any county, municipal or state officer to acquire by purchase, directly or indirectly, at less than its face value any warrant or other evidence of indebtedness issued for any school purpose whatsoever by the governing body of any county, city or town or by any school board. Any violation of the provisions of this section shall be a Class 3 misdemeanor. Upon the conviction of any such officer of a violation of this section, his office shall be deemed vacant.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-212; 1980, c. 559.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.